District of Columbia statutes.
16-1501

Definition; summons.

When a person detains possession of real property without right, or after his right to possession has ceased, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, on complaint under oath verified by the person aggrieved by the detention, or by his agent or attorney having knowledge of the facts, may issue a summons in English and Spanish to the party complained of to appear and show cause why judgment should not be given against him for the restitution of possession.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 560, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(g)(1)
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-90,§ 2(a), 31 DCR 2537
Ejectment actions, see § 42-3210.
Forcible entry and detainer, see § 22-3301.
Remedies of purchaser upon refusal to deliver possession, see § 15-318.
Sufferance estates, see § 42-520.
This section is referenced in § 15-318, § 16-1502, and § 42-3602.
1981 Ed., § 16-1501.
1973 Ed., § 16-1501.